Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-705
Licensed practitioner, defined.

Licensed practitioner means any physician or osteopathic physician licensed to prescribe, diagnose, and treat as prescribed in the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 235.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.